Nevada, session 83, AB575.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
Highway Fund to the Investigation Division of the Department of
Public Safety the sum of $1,886 for the replacement of computer
hardware and associated software.
Sec. 2. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Investigation Division of the Department of Public
Safety the sum of $9,742 for the replacement of desk chairs.
Sec. 3. There is hereby appropriated from the State Highway
Fund to the Investigation Division of the Department of Public
Safety the sum of $2,598 for the replacement of desk chairs.
Sec. 4. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Central Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal
History within the Records, Communications and Compliance
Division of the Department of Public Safety the sum of $866,832
for the costs of consulting fees and change management services for
the Nevada Criminal Justice Information System.
Sec. 5. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Central Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal
History within the Records, Communications and Compliance
Division of the Department of Public Safety the sum of $2,022,607
for the continuation of the modernization program for the Nevada
Criminal Justice Information System.
Sec. 6. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Public Safety the sum of $840,926 for a
recruitment campaign.
Sec. 6.3. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Public Safety the sum of $462,748 for
the replacement of computer network equipment and associated
software.
Sec. 6.7. There is hereby appropriated from the State Highway
Fund to the Department of Public Safety the sum of $283,620 for
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
the replacement of computer network equipment and associated
software.
Sec. 7. Any remaining balance of an appropriation made by
sections 1 to 6.7, inclusive, of this act must not be committed for
expenditure after June 30, 2027, by the entity to which the
appropriation is made or any entity to which money from the
appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in any manner, and
any portion of the appropriated money remaining must not be spent
for any purpose after September 17, 2027, by either the entity to
which the money was appropriated or the entity to which the money
was subsequently granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the
fund from which it was appropriated on or before September 17,
2027.
Sec. 8. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Division of Parole and Probation of the
Department of Public Safety for the costs of developing a new
records management system the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $151,450
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $151,450
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 9. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Division of Parole and Probation of the
Department of Public Safety for the replacement of equipment and
the renewal of software subscriptions the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $1,351,429
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ...................................... $2,380
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 10. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Investigation Division of the Department of
Public Safety for the replacement of vehicles the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $133,339
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $228,715
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 11. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
Highway Fund to the Investigation Division of the Department of
Public Safety for the replacement of vehicles the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................... $55,893
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ......................................... $558
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State Highway Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 12. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Investigation Division of the Department of
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
Public Safety for the replacement of computer hardware and
associated software the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................... $50,692
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................... $46,920
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 13. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Central Repository for Nevada Records of
Criminal History within the Records, Communications and
Compliance Division of the Department of Public Safety for the
costs of additional positions to provide ongoing support for the
Nevada Criminal Justice Information System the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $498,943
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $623,345
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 14. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Central Repository for Nevada Records of
Criminal History within the Records, Communications and
Compliance Division of the Department of Public Safety for the
costs of computer programming and related services for the
modernization program for the Nevada Criminal Justice Information
System the following sums:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $1,355,000
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $300,000
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 15. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)